Nebraska, session 109, LB885.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB885 LB885
2026 2026
Section 1. Section 72-1240, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
72-1240 The council shall appoint a state investment officer. The
appointment shall be subject to the approval of the Governor and a
majority of the Legislature. The state investment officer shall be a
person well qualified by training to administer and invest the money
available for investment, and he or she shall have at least five years of
experience in the management of investment portfolios. The state
investment officer's salary shall be fixed by the council at not less
than twenty-five thousand dollars per year. The state investment officer
shall serve without term and may be removed for cause by the council or
the Governor.
Sec. 2. Original section 72-1240, Reissue Revised Statutes of
Nebraska, is repealed.
-2-